New York, session 2025-2026, S2635.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "vicarious liability for housing discrimination act of 2025". 3 § 2. Section 296 of the executive law is amended by adding a new 4 subdivision 23 to read as follows: 5 23. For purposes of establishing liability for an unlawful discrimina- 6 tory practice related to the sale, rental, or lease of a private or 7 publicly-assisted housing accommodation, any person shall be vicariously 8 liable for a discriminatory practice by such person's agent or employee, 9 regardless of whether such person encouraged, condoned, approved of, or 10 knew or should have known of the conduct that resulted in a discrimina- 11 tory practice, consistent with agency law. 12 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04250-01-5